Utah statutes.
19-1-304.   Principal and branch offices of department.
(1)  The principal office of the department shall be in Salt Lake County.
(2)  The department may establish branch offices at other places in the state
to furnish comprehensive and effective environmental programs and to
coordinate with and assist local health officers.
